Washington statutes.
RCW 7.07.100

Relation to electronic signatures in global and national commerce act.

This chapter modifies, limits, or supersedes the federal electronic signatures in global and national commerce act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et seq.), but this chapter does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) of that act or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act.

[ 2005 c 172 s 11.]